Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko H.F. 123 Section 1. Section 125.75, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. State the applicantâs belief that the respondent is 3 a person who is experiencing psychiatric deterioration as 4 defined in section 229.1, or who presents a danger to self or 5 others and lacks judgmental capacity due to either any of the 6 following: 7 (1) A substance use disorder as defined in section 125.2 . 8 (2) A serious mental impairment as defined in section 229.1 . 9 Sec. 2. Section 218.46, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 2. The department may provide services and facilities 12 for the scientific observation, rechecking, and treatment of 13 persons with mental illness within the state. Application 14 by, or on behalf of, any person for such services and 15 facilities shall be made to the director on forms furnished 16 by the department. The time and place of admission of any 17 person to outpatient or clinical services and facilities for 18 scientific observation, rechecking, and treatment and the use 19 of such services and facilities for the benefit of persons 20 who have already been hospitalized for psychiatric evaluation 21 and appropriate treatment or involuntarily hospitalized as 22 seriously mentally ill shall be in accordance with rules and 23 regulations adopted by the department. 24 Sec. 3. Section 225.11, Code 2025, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 225.11 Initiating commitment procedures. 27 When a court finds upon completion of a hearing held pursuant 28 to section 229.12 that the contention that a respondent is 29 seriously mentally impaired , or is experiencing psychiatric 30 deterioration, has been sustained by clear and convincing 31 evidence, and the application filed under section 229.6 also 32 contends or the court otherwise concludes that it would be 33 appropriate to refer the respondent to the state psychiatric 34 hospital for a complete psychiatric evaluation and appropriate 35 -1- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 1/ 14 H.F. 123 treatment pursuant to section 229.13 , the judge may order that 1 a financial investigation be made in the manner prescribed by 2 section 225.13 . If the costs of a respondentâs evaluation or 3 treatment are payable in whole or in part by a county, an order 4 under this section shall be for referral of the respondent 5 through the regional administrator for the respondentâs county 6 of residence for an evaluation and referral of the respondent 7 to an appropriate placement or service, which may include 8 the state psychiatric hospital for additional evaluation or 9 treatment. 10 Sec. 4. Section 229.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. âPsychiatric deteriorationâ means a 13 deterioration of a personâs mental health described by all of 14 the following: 15 a. The deterioration makes the person unable to understand 16 the need to treat the personâs mental health condition. 17 b. Based on the personâs history the person is unlikely to 18 seek treatment for the deterioration. 19 c. Within a reasonable degree of medical certainty, unless 20 the person receives treatment, the deterioration is likely to 21 continue until the person has a serious mental impairment. 22 Sec. 5. Section 229.4, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 3. If the chief medical officer of the hospital, not later 25 than the end of the next secular business day on which the 26 office of the clerk of the district court for the county in 27 which the hospital is located is open and which follows the 28 submission of the written request for release of the patient, 29 files with that clerk a certification that in the chief medical 30 officerâs opinion the patient is seriously mentally impaired , 31 or experiencing psychiatric deterioration , the release may 32 be postponed for the period of time the court determines is 33 necessary to permit commencement of judicial procedure for 34 involuntary hospitalization. That period of time may not 35 -2- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 2/ 14 H.F. 123 exceed five days, exclusive of days on which the clerkâs 1 office is not open unless the period of time is extended by 2 order of a district court judge for good cause shown. Until 3 disposition of the application for involuntary hospitalization 4 of the patient is determined, if an application is timely 5 filed, the chief medical officer may detain the patient in 6 the hospital and may provide treatment which is necessary 7 to preserve the patientâs life, or to appropriately control 8 behavior by the patient which is likely to result in physical 9 injury to the patient or to others if allowed to continue, but 10 may not otherwise provide treatment to the patient without the 11 patientâs consent. 12 Sec. 6. Section 229.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 229.5 Departure without notice. 15 If a voluntary patient departs from the hospital without 16 notice, and in the opinion of the chief medical officer 17 the patient is seriously mentally impaired , or experiencing 18 psychiatric deterioration , the chief medical officer may file 19 an application on the departed voluntary patient pursuant to 20 section 229.6 , and request that an order for immediate custody 21 be entered by the court pursuant to section 229.11 . 22 Sec. 7. Section 229.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, 23 is amended to read as follows: 24 a. State the applicantâs belief that the respondent is 25 a person who is experiencing psychiatric deterioration, or 26 who presents a danger to self or others and lacks judgmental 27 capacity due to either any of the following: 28 (1) A substance use disorder as defined in section 125.2 . 29 (2) A serious mental impairment as defined in section 229.1 . 30 Sec. 8. Section 229.10, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 3. If the report of one or more of the court-designated 33 physicians or mental health professionals is to the effect that 34 the individual is not seriously mentally impaired and is not 35 -3- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 3/ 14 H.F. 123 experiencing psychiatric deterioration , the court shall without 1 taking further action terminate the proceeding and dismiss the 2 application on its own motion and without notice. 3 4. If the report of one or more of the court-designated 4 physicians or mental health professionals is to the effect 5 that the respondent is seriously mentally impaired , or is 6 experiencing psychiatric deterioration , the court shall 7 schedule a hearing on the application as soon as possible. 8 The hearing shall be held not more than forty-eight hours 9 after the report is filed, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and 10 holidays, unless an extension for good cause is requested 11 by the respondent, or as soon thereafter as possible if the 12 court considers that sufficient grounds exist for delaying the 13 hearing. 14 Sec. 9. Section 229.11, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 15 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 If the applicant requests that the respondent be taken into 17 immediate custody and the judge, upon reviewing the application 18 and accompanying documentation, finds probable cause to 19 believe that the respondent has a serious mental impairment 20 and is likely to injure the respondent or other persons if 21 allowed to remain at liberty , or the respondent is experiencing 22 psychiatric deterioration , the judge may enter a written order 23 directing that the respondent be taken into immediate custody 24 by the sheriff or the sheriffâs deputy and be detained until 25 the hospitalization hearing. The hospitalization hearing shall 26 be held no more than five days after the date of the order, 27 except that if the fifth day after the date of the order is 28 a Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday, the hearing may be held 29 on the next succeeding business day. If the expenses of a 30 respondent are payable in whole or in part by a mental health 31 and disability services region, for a placement in accordance 32 with paragraph âaâ , the judge shall give notice of the placement 33 to the regional administrator for the county in which the court 34 is located, and for a placement in accordance with paragraph 35 -4- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 4/ 14 H.F. 123 âbâ or âcâ , the judge shall order the placement in a hospital or 1 facility designated through the regional administrator. The 2 judge may order the respondent detained for the period of time 3 until the hearing is held, and no longer, in accordance with 4 paragraph âaâ , if possible, and if not then in accordance with 5 paragraph âbâ , or, only if neither of these alternatives is 6 available, in accordance with paragraph âcâ . Detention may be 7 in any of the following: 8 Sec. 10. Section 229.12, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 9 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 c. If upon completion of the hearing the court finds that 11 the contention that the respondent is seriously mentally 12 impaired , or is experiencing psychiatric deterioration, has not 13 been sustained by clear and convincing evidence, it shall deny 14 the application and terminate the proceeding. 15 Sec. 11. Section 229.13, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 16 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 If upon completion of the hospitalization hearing the court 18 finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent has 19 a serious mental impairment , or is experiencing psychiatric 20 deterioration , the court shall order the respondent committed 21 as expeditiously as possible for a complete psychiatric 22 evaluation and appropriate treatment as follows: 23 Sec. 12. Section 229.13, subsection 7, paragraph a, 24 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 (3) If the respondent chooses to be treated by the 26 appropriate medication which may include the use of oral 27 medicine or injectable antipsychotic medicine but the mental 28 health professional acting within the scope of the mental 29 health professionalâs practice at the outpatient psychiatric 30 clinic, hospital, or other suitable facility determines that 31 the respondentâs behavior continues to be likely to result in 32 physical injury to the respondentâs self or others if allowed 33 to continue, the mental health professional acting within 34 the scope of the mental health professionalâs practice shall 35 -5- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 5/ 14 H.F. 123 comply with the provisions of subparagraph (1) and, following 1 notice and hearing held in accordance with the procedures in 2 section 229.12 , the court may order the respondent treated 3 on an inpatient basis requiring full-time custody, care, 4 and treatment in a hospital until such time as the chief 5 medical officer reports that the respondent does not require 6 further treatment for serious mental impairment or psychiatric 7 deterioration, or has indicated the respondent is willing to 8 submit to treatment on another basis as ordered by the court. 9 Sec. 13. Section 229.14, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 10 and d, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 11 a. That the respondent does not, as of the date of the 12 report, require further treatment for serious mental impairment 13 or psychiatric deterioration . If the report so states, the 14 court shall order the respondentâs immediate release from 15 involuntary hospitalization and terminate the proceedings. 16 b. That the respondent is seriously mentally impaired and or 17 experiencing psychiatric deterioration, is in need of full-time 18 custody, care , and inpatient treatment in a hospital, and is 19 considered likely to benefit from treatment. The report shall 20 include the chief medical officerâs recommendation for further 21 treatment. 22 c. That the respondent is seriously mentally impaired or 23 experiencing psychiatric deterioration, and is in need of 24 treatment, but does not require full-time hospitalization. 25 If the report so states, it shall include the chief medical 26 officerâs recommendation for treatment of the respondent on an 27 outpatient or other appropriate basis. 28 d. The respondent is seriously mentally impaired or 29 experiencing psychiatric deterioration, and is in need of 30 full-time custody and care, but is unlikely to benefit from 31 further inpatient treatment in a hospital. The report shall 32 include the chief medical officerâs recommendation for an 33 appropriate alternative placement for the respondent. 34 Sec. 14. Section 229.14, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 35 -6- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 6/ 14 H.F. 123 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 d. If the court orders treatment of the respondent on an 2 outpatient or other appropriate basis as described in the chief 3 medical officerâs report pursuant to subsection 1 , paragraph 4 âcâ , the order shall provide that, should the respondent 5 fail or refuse to submit to treatment in accordance with the 6 courtâs order, the court may order that the respondent be 7 taken into immediate custody as provided by section 229.11 8 and, following notice and hearing held in accordance with 9 the procedures of section 229.12 , may order the respondent 10 treated on an inpatient basis requiring full-time custody, 11 care, and treatment in a hospital until such time as the chief 12 medical officer reports that the respondent does not require 13 further treatment for serious mental impairment or psychiatric 14 deterioration, or has indicated the respondent is willing to 15 submit to treatment on another basis as ordered by the court. 16 If a patient is transferred for treatment to another provider 17 under this paragraph, the treatment provider who will be 18 providing the outpatient or other appropriate treatment shall 19 be provided with copies of relevant court orders by the former 20 treatment provider. 21 Sec. 15. Section 229.16, Code 2025, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 229.16 Discharge and termination of proceeding. 24 When the condition of a patient who is hospitalized pursuant 25 to a report issued under section 229.14, subsection 1 , 26 paragraph âbâ , or is receiving treatment pursuant to a report 27 issued under section 229.14, subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , or is 28 in full-time care and custody pursuant to a report issued under 29 section 229.14, subsection 1 , paragraph âdâ , is such that in 30 the opinion of the chief medical officer the patient no longer 31 requires treatment or care for serious mental impairment , or 32 psychiatric deterioration , the chief medical officer shall 33 tentatively discharge the patient and immediately report that 34 fact to the court which ordered the patientâs hospitalization 35 -7- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 7/ 14 H.F. 123 or care and custody. Upon receiving the report, the court 1 shall issue an order confirming the patientâs discharge from 2 the hospital or from care and custody, as the case may be, and 3 shall terminate the proceedings pursuant to which the order was 4 issued. Copies of the order shall be sent by regular mail to 5 the hospital, the patient, and the applicant if the applicant 6 has filed a written waiver signed by the patient. 7 Sec. 16. Section 229.17, Code 2025, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 229.17 Status of respondent during appeal. 10 If a respondent appeals to the supreme court from a finding 11 that the contention the respondent is seriously mentally 12 impaired , or is experiencing psychiatric deterioration, has 13 been sustained, and the respondent was previously ordered 14 taken into immediate custody under section 229.11 or has 15 been hospitalized for psychiatric evaluation and appropriate 16 treatment under section 229.13 before the court is informed 17 of intent to appeal its finding, the respondent shall remain 18 in custody as previously ordered by the court, the time limit 19 stated in section 229.11 notwithstanding, or shall remain 20 in the hospital subject to compliance by the hospital with 21 sections 229.13 through 229.16 , as the case may be, unless the 22 supreme court orders otherwise. If a respondent appeals to the 23 supreme court regarding a placement order, the respondent shall 24 remain in placement unless the supreme court orders otherwise. 25 Sec. 17. Section 229.19, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 26 2025, is amended to read as follows: 27 c. The advocateâs responsibility with respect to any patient 28 shall begin at whatever time the attorney employed or appointed 29 to represent that patient as respondent in hospitalization 30 proceedings, conducted under sections 229.6 through 229.13 , 31 reports to the court that the attorneyâs services are no longer 32 required and requests the courtâs approval to withdraw as 33 counsel for that patient. However, if the patient is found to 34 be seriously mentally impaired , or experiencing psychiatric 35 -8- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 8/ 14 H.F. 123 deterioration, at the hospitalization hearing, the attorney 1 representing the patient shall automatically be relieved of 2 responsibility in the case and an advocate shall be assigned 3 to the patient at the conclusion of the hearing unless the 4 attorney indicates an intent to continue the attorneyâs 5 services and the court so directs. If the court directs the 6 attorney to remain on the case, the attorney shall assume 7 all the duties of an advocate. The clerk shall furnish 8 the advocate with a copy of the courtâs order approving the 9 withdrawal and shall inform the patient of the name of the 10 patientâs advocate. 11 Sec. 18. Section 229.21, subsection 3, paragraphs a and b, 12 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 13 a. Any respondent with respect to whom the magistrate or 14 judicial hospitalization referee has found the contention that 15 the respondent is seriously mentally impaired , is experiencing 16 psychiatric deterioration, or is a person with a substance use 17 disorder sustained by clear and convincing evidence presented 18 at a hearing held under section 229.12 or section 125.82 , may 19 appeal from the magistrateâs or refereeâs finding to a judge 20 of the district court by giving the clerk notice in writing, 21 within ten days after the magistrateâs or refereeâs finding is 22 made, that an appeal is taken. The appeal may be signed by 23 the respondent or by the respondentâs next friend, guardian, 24 or attorney. 25 b. An order of a magistrate or judicial hospitalization 26 referee with a finding that the respondent is seriously 27 mentally impaired , is experiencing psychiatric deterioration, 28 or is a person with a substance use disorder shall include the 29 following notice, located conspicuously on the face of the 30 order: 31 NOTE: The respondent may appeal from this order to a judge of 32 the district court by giving written notice of the appeal to 33 the clerk of the district court within ten days after the date 34 of this order. The appeal may be signed by the respondent or 35 -9- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 9/ 14 H.F. 123 by the respondentâs next friend, guardian, or attorney. For a 1 more complete description of the respondentâs appeal rights, 2 consult section 229.21 of the Code of Iowa or an attorney. 3 Sec. 19. Section 229.22, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. The procedure prescribed by this section shall be used 6 when it appears that a person should be immediately detained 7 due to serious mental impairment or psychiatric deterioration , 8 but an application has not been filed naming the person as the 9 respondent pursuant to section 229.6 , and the person cannot be 10 ordered into immediate custody and detained pursuant to section 11 229.11 . 12 Sec. 20. Section 229.22, subsection 2, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (4), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 (a) If the examining physician, examining physician 16 assistant, examining mental health professional, or examining 17 psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner finds 18 that there is reason to believe that the person is seriously 19 mentally impaired, and because of that impairment is likely 20 to physically injure the personâs self or others if not 21 immediately detained , or the person is experiencing psychiatric 22 deterioration , the facility shall have the authority to detain 23 the person for a period of no longer than twelve hours. Within 24 twelve hours of detaining a person pursuant to this section , 25 the examining physician, examining physician assistant, 26 examining mental health professional, or examining psychiatric 27 advanced registered nurse practitioner shall communicate with 28 the nearest available magistrate. 29 Sec. 21. Section 229.22, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. If the magistrate orders that the person be detained, 32 the magistrate shall, by the close of business on the next 33 working day, file a written order with the clerk in the county 34 where it is anticipated that an application may be filed 35 -10- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 10/ 14 H.F. 123 under section 229.6 . The order may be filed by facsimile if 1 necessary. A peace officer from the law enforcement agency 2 that took the person into custody, if no request was made 3 under paragraph âaâ , may inform the magistrate that an arrest 4 warrant has been issued for or charges are pending against 5 the person and request that any written order issued under 6 this paragraph require the facility or hospital to notify 7 the law enforcement agency about the discharge of the person 8 prior to discharge. The order shall state the circumstances 9 under which the person was taken into custody or otherwise 10 brought to a facility or hospital, and the grounds supporting 11 the finding of probable cause to believe that the person is 12 seriously mentally impaired and likely to injure the personâs 13 self or others if not immediately detained , or the person is 14 experiencing psychiatric deterioration . The order shall also 15 include any law enforcement agency notification requirements if 16 applicable. The order shall confirm the oral order authorizing 17 the personâs detention including any order given to transport 18 the person to an appropriate facility or hospital. A peace 19 officer from the law enforcement agency that took the person 20 into custody may also request an order, separate from the 21 written order, requiring the facility or hospital to notify the 22 law enforcement agency about the discharge of the person prior 23 to discharge. The clerk shall provide a copy of the written 24 order or any separate order to the chief medical officer of the 25 facility or hospital to which the person was originally taken, 26 to any subsequent facility to which the person was transported, 27 and to any law enforcement department, ambulance service, or 28 transportation service under contract with a mental health 29 and disability services region that transported the person 30 pursuant to the magistrateâs order. A transportation service 31 that contracts with a mental health and disability services 32 region for purposes of this paragraph shall provide a secure 33 transportation vehicle and shall employ staff that has received 34 or is receiving mental health training. 35 -11- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 11/ 14 H.F. 123 Sec. 22. Section 229.26, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 229.26 Exclusive procedure for involuntary hospitalization. 3 Sections 229.6 through 229.19 constitute the exclusive 4 procedure for involuntary hospitalization of persons by reason 5 of serious mental impairment , or psychiatric deterioration, 6 in this state, except that this chapter does not negate the 7 provisions of section 904.503 relating to transfer of prisoners 8 with mental illness to state mental health institutes and 9 does not apply to commitments of persons under chapter 812 or 10 the rules of criminal procedure, Iowa court rules, or negate 11 the provisions of section 232.51 relating to disposition of 12 children with mental illness. 13 Sec. 23. Section 229.28, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 14 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 When a court finds that the contention that a respondent is 16 seriously mentally impaired , or is experiencing psychiatric 17 deterioration, has been sustained or proposes to order 18 continued hospitalization of any person, or an alternative 19 placement, as described under section 229.14, subsection 1 , 20 paragraph âbâ or âdâ , and the court is furnished evidence that 21 the respondent or patient is eligible for care and treatment in 22 a facility operated by the United States department of veterans 23 affairs or another agency of the United States government and 24 that the facility is willing to receive the respondent or 25 patient, the court may so order. 26 Sec. 24. Section 229.31, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 229.31 Commission of inquiry. 29 A sworn complaint, alleging that a named person is not 30 seriously mentally impaired or experiencing psychiatric 31 deterioration, and is unjustly deprived of liberty in any 32 hospital in the state, may be filed by any person with the 33 clerk of the district court of the county in which such named 34 person is so confined, or of the county in which such named 35 -12- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 12/ 14 H.F. 123 person is a resident. Upon receiving the complaint, a judge 1 of that court shall appoint a commission of not more than 2 three persons to inquire into the truth of the allegations. 3 One of the commissioners shall be a physician and if 4 additional commissioners are appointed, one of the additional 5 commissioners shall be a lawyer. 6 Sec. 25. Section 229.33, Code 2025, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 229.33 Hearing. 9 If, on such report and statement, and the hearing of 10 testimony if any is offered, the judge shall find that 11 such person is not seriously mentally impaired , and is not 12 experiencing psychiatric deterioration , the judge shall order 13 the personâs discharge; if the contrary, the judge shall so 14 state, and authorize the continued detention of the person, 15 subject to all applicable requirements of this chapter . 16 Sec. 26. Section 229.37, Code 2025, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 229.37 Habeas corpus. 19 All persons confined as seriously mentally impaired , or as 20 experiencing psychiatric deterioration, shall be entitled to 21 the benefit of the writ of habeas corpus, and the question 22 of serious mental impairment , or psychiatric deterioration, 23 shall be decided at the hearing. If the judge shall decide 24 that the person is seriously mentally impaired , or experiencing 25 psychiatric deterioration , such decision shall be no bar to the 26 issuing of the writ a second time, whenever it shall be alleged 27 that such person is no longer seriously mentally impaired or 28 experiencing psychiatric deterioration . 29 Sec. 27. Section 602.8102, subsection 41, Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 41. Carry out duties relating to the involuntary commitment 32 of persons with mental impairments commitments as provided in 33 chapter 125 and involuntary hospitalizations as provided in 34 chapter 229 . 35 -13- LSB 1763YH (6) 91 dg/ko 13/ 14 H.F. 123